Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2004.01
Container, defined.

Container means a bag, cup, can, pouch, package, container, bottle, or other packaging that is (1) designed to be reusable, recyclable, or single-use, (2) made of cloth, paper, plastic, including foamed or expanded plastic, cardboard, corrugated material, aluminum, glass, or postconsumer recycled or similar material or substrates, including coated, laminated, or multilayer substrates, and (3) designed for consuming, protecting, or transporting merchandise, food, or beverages from or at a food service or retail facility.

Laws 2020, LB632, § 4.